Washington statutes.
RCW 23.100.1317

Nonexclusivity.

The fact that a conversion or merger under this subchapter produces a certain result does not preclude the same result from being accomplished in any other manner permitted by law other than this subchapter.

[ 2019 c 37 s 1317.]